Washington statutes.
RCW 18.134.060

Location of care—Venue.

(1) The provision of a telehealth service under this chapter occurs at the patient's location at the time the service is provided.

(2) In a civil action arising out of a health care practitioner's provision of a telehealth service to a patient under this chapter, brought by the patient or the patient's personal representative, conservator, guardian, or a person entitled to bring a claim under the state's wrongful death statute, venue is proper in the patient's county of residence in this state or in another county authorized by law.

[ 2024 c 212 s 7.]